District of Columbia statutes.
42-2706.05

Laws or acts referred to in this chapter.

Each law or act of the District identified in this chapter shall include any and all amendments thereto made from time to time, and shall include any and all superseding laws and acts, unless the superseding law or act expressly provides otherwise.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 605
as added Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-28, § 2(w), 28 DCR 2848
1973 Ed., § 45-1932.
1981 Ed., § 45-2165.